Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 10. Annual Registration Fees.

§ 13.1-1251.
Annual registration fees to be assessed and collected by Commission; application of payment.

The Commission shall assess and collect the annual registration fees imposed by this chapter. When the Commission receives payment of a registration fee assessed against a domestic or foreign business trust, such payment shall be applied against any unpaid registration fees previously assessed against such business trust, including any penalties incurred thereon, beginning with the assessment that has remained unpaid for the longest period of time.

History.

2002, c. 621.

§ 13.1-1252.
Assessment of annual registration fees; annual registration fee to be paid by domestic and foreign business trusts.

Every domestic business trust, and every foreign business trust registered to transact business in the Commonwealth, shall pay into the state treasury on or before October 1 in each year after the calendar year in which it was formed or registered to transact business in the Commonwealth an annual registration fee of $50, provided that for a domestic business trust that became a domestic business trust by conversion from a domestic stock corporation or limited liability company, or by domestication from a foreign business trust that was registered to transact business in the Commonwealth at the time of the domestication, the initial annual registration fee to be paid by the domestic business trust shall be due in the year after the calendar year in which the conversion became effective when the annual registration fee of the domestic stock corporation or limited liability company or foreign business trust was paid for the calendar year in which the conversion or domestication became effective.The annual registration fee shall be imposed irrespective of any specific license tax or other tax or fee imposed by law upon the business trust for the privilege of carrying on its business in the Commonwealth or upon its franchise, property, or receipts.

Each year, the Commission shall ascertain from its records each domestic business trust and each foreign business trust registered to transact business in the Commonwealth as of July 1 and, except as provided in subsection A, shall assess against each such business trust the annual registration fee herein imposed.

A statement of the assessment, when made, shall be forwarded by the clerk of the Commission to the Comptroller and to each domestic and foreign business trust.

A domestic or foreign business trust shall not be required to pay the annual registration fee assessed against it pursuant to subsection B in any year if (i) the Commission issues or files any of the following types of certificate or instrument and (ii) the certificate or instrument is effective on or before the annual registration fee due date:

A certificate of cancellation of existence or a certificate of trust surrender for a domestic business trust;

A certificate of cancellation for a foreign business trust;

A certificate of merger or an authenticated copy of an instrument of merger for a domestic or foreign business trust that has merged into a surviving domestic business trust or other business entity or into a surviving foreign business trust or other business entity; or

An authenticated copy of an instrument of entity conversion for a foreign business trust that has converted to a different entity type.The Commission shall cancel the annual registration fee assessments specified in this subsection that remain unpaid.

Annual registration fee assessments that have been paid shall not be refunded.

The fees paid into the state treasury under this section and the fees collected under §

13.1-1204

shall be set aside and paid into the special fund created under §

13.1-775.1

, and shall be used only by the Commission as it deems necessary to defray the costs of the Commission and of the office of the clerk of the Commission in supervising, implementing, administering and enforcing the provisions of this chapter. The projected excess of fees collected over the costs of administration and enforcement so incurred shall be paid into the general fund prior to the close of each fiscal year, based on the unexpended balance of the special fund at the end of the prior fiscal year. An adjustment of this transfer amount to reflect actual fees collected shall occur during the first quarter of the succeeding fiscal year.

History.

2002, c. 621; 2007, c. 810; 2013, c. 25; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 3 provides: “That until July 1, 2023, the term ‘incorporation surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia, the term ‘organization surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 12 (§

13.1-1000

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia, and the term ‘trust surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 14 (§

13.1-1200

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia shall also be construed to mean ‘domestication,’ and the term ‘entity conversion’ when used in any provision of Chapter 10, 12, or 14 of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia shall also be construed to mean ‘conversion.’ ”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 810, in subsection A, substitued “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth,” “October 1” for “September 1,” and “$50” for “fifty dollars.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 25 designated the existing provisions of the section as the first paragraph of subsection A and subsection F; added the second paragraph of subsection A and subsections B through E; and in the first paragraph of subsection A, substituted “each” for “every” twice near the beginning, and added the proviso at the end.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the first paragraph of subsection A, which read: “Each domestic business trust and each foreign business trust registered to transact business in the Commonwealth, shall pay into the state treasury on or before October 1 in each year after the calendar year in which it was formed or registered to transact business in the Commonwealth an annual registration fee of $50, provided that the initial annual registration fee to be paid by a domestic business trust created by entity conversion shall be due in the year after the calendar year in which it converted”; rewrote subsection D, which read: “Any domestic business trust that has ceased to exist in the Commonwealth because of the issuance of a certificate of cancellation of existence, certificate of trust surrender, or certificate of entity conversion, or any foreign business trust that has obtained a certificate of cancellation, effective on or before its annual registration fee due date pursuant to subsection A in any year, shall not be required to pay the annual registration fee for that year. Any domestic or foreign business trust that has merged, effective on or before its annual registration fee due date pursuant to subsection A in any year, into a surviving domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, business trust, limited partnership, or partnership that files with the Commission an authenticated copy of the instrument of merger on or before such date, shall not be required to pay the annual registration fee for that year. Any foreign business trust that has converted, effective on or before its annual registration fee due date pursuant to subsection A in any year, to a different entity type that files with the Commission an authenticated copy of the instrument of entity conversion on or before such date, shall not be required to pay the annual registration fee for that year. The Commission shall cancel the annual registration fee assessments specified in this subsection that remain unpaid”; and substituted “Annual registration” for “Registration” in subsection E. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

§ 13.1-1253.
Repealed by Acts 2013, c. 25, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

13.1-1253

, pertaining to assessment of annual registration fees and forwarding of statements, derived from Acts 2002, c. 621.

§ 13.1-1254.
Penalty for failure to timely pay annual registration fees or file statement of change.

Any domestic or any foreign business trust that fails to pay the annual registration fee into the state treasury within the time prescribed in §

13.1-1252

shall incur a penalty of $25, which shall be added to the amount of the annual registration fee due. The penalty prescribed herein shall be in addition to any other penalty or liability imposed by law.

The Commission shall mail to each domestic and foreign business trust that fails to pay its annual registration fee within the time prescribed in §

13.1-1252

a notice of assessment of the penalty imposed herein and of the impending cancellation of its existence or certificate of registration, as the case may be.

History.

2002, c. 621; 2003, c. 373; 2004, cc. 274, 601; 2008, c. 101.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 373, effective October 1, 2003, in subsection A, substituted “$25” for “twenty-five dollars”; in subsection B, added the subdivision 1 designator; and added subdivision B 2.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 274, in subsection D, inserted the clause (i) designation and added clause (ii) at the end of the first sentence; and made a related change.

The 2004 amendment by c. 601 added subdivision B 3; in subsection D, in the first sentence, substituted “or §

13.1-1246

” for “of this section” and “five” for “two”; and in subsection E, in the next-to-last sentence, substituted “five” for “two” and inserted “or §

13.1-1246

.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 101, effective April 1, 2009, rewrote the section.

§ 13.1-1255.
Payment of fees, fines, penalties, and interest prerequisite to Commission action; refunds.

The Commission shall not file or issue with respect to any domestic or foreign business trust any document or certificate specified in this chapter, except a statement of change pursuant to §

13.1-1221

and a statement of resignation pursuant to §

13.1-1222

, until all fees, fines, penalties, and interest assessed, imposed, charged, or to be collected by the Commission pursuant to this chapter or Title 12.1 have been paid by or on behalf of such business trust. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Commission may file or issue any document or certificate with respect to a domestic or foreign business trust that has been assessed an annual registration fee if the document or certificate is filed or issued with an effective date that is on or before the due date of the business trust’s annual registration fee payment in any year, provided that the Commission shall not issue a certificate of domestication with respect to a foreign business trust or a certificate of entity conversion with respect to a domestic business trust that will become a domestic stock corporation or limited liability company until the annual registration fee has been paid by or on behalf of that business trust.

The Commission shall have the authority to certify to the Comptroller directing refund of any overpayment of a fee, or of any fee collected for a document that is not accepted for filing, at any time within one year from the date of its payment.

History.

2002, c. 621; 2004, c. 316; 2006, c. 659; 2007, c. 810; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 316 inserted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph and added subsection B.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 659, in subsection A, in the first sentence, deleted “any” following “domestic or,” substituted “document or certificate specified” for “certificate referred to,” and inserted “except a statement of change pursuant to §

13.1-1221

and a statement of resignation pursuant to §

13.1-1222

” and added the last sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 810, in subsection A, substituted “on or before” for “prior to” and added the proviso at the end of the second sentence.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “or a certificate of entity conversion with respect to a domestic business trust that will become a domestic stock corporation or limited liability company” in subsection A. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-1256.
Collection by suit and of unpaid bills.

The provisions of §§

13.1-775.1

and

58.1-2814

, so far as they are applicable, shall apply to the annual registration fees and penalties imposed by this chapter.

History.

2002, c. 621.